District of Columbia statutes.
5-127.01

Conduct of force; power to fine, suspend and dismiss; written charges; opportunity to be heard; removal without trial; amendment of charges.

In addition to the powers vested in them by law, the Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to make and modify, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to enforce, under such penalties as the Council may deem necessary, all needful rules and regulations for the proper government, conduct, discipline, and good name of said Metropolitan Police force; and said Mayor is hereby authorized and empowered to fine, suspend with or without pay, and dismiss any officer or member of said police force for any offense against the laws of the United States or the laws and ordinances or regulations of the District of Columbia, whether before or after conviction thereof in any court or courts, and for misconduct in office, or for any breaches or violation of the rules and regulations made by the Council for the government, conduct, discipline, and good name of said police force; provided, that no person shall be removed from said police force except upon written charges preferred against him in the name of the Chief of Police of said police force to the trial board or boards hereinafter provided for and after an opportunity shall have been afforded him of being heard in his defense; but no person so removed shall be reappointed to any office in said police force; provided further, that special policemen and additional privates may be removed from office by the Mayor without cause and without trial; provided further, that charges preferred against any member of said police force to the trial board or boards hereinafter provided for may be altered or amended, in the discretion of such trial board or boards, at any time before final action by such board or boards, under such regulations as the Council may adopt, provided the accused have an opportunity to be heard thereon.

Feb. 28, 1901, 31 Stat. 819, ch. 623, § 1
June 8, 1906, 34 Stat. 221, ch. 3056

History

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see 1-632.03.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 4-117.
1973 Ed., § 4-121.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) video surveillance regulations, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department Video Surveillance Regulations Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-10, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1481).

Emergency Legislation

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “Police Officers Outside Employment Act of 1982” (D.C. Law 4-132, July 24, 1982, 29 DCR 2450).

New Implementing Regulations

Delegation of Personnel Authority in the Metropolitan Police Department to the Chief of Police: See Mayor’s Order 97-88, May 9,

Mayor's Orders

Office of Major and Superintendent of Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.

Editor's Notes

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(93) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government